New York, session 2025-2026, S862.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 832 of the exec- 2 utive law, as added by section 12 of part VVV of chapter 59 of the laws 3 of 2017, is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) Caseload relief. Develop and implement a written plan that estab- 5 lishes numerical caseload/workload standards for each provider of 6 constitutionally mandated publicly funded representation in criminal 7 cases for people who are unable to afford counsel, provided that annual 8 individual numerical caseload/workload standards may not exceed three 9 hundred sixty-seven misdemeanors or one hundred thirty-eight felonies, 10 with each felony counting as two and sixty-six hundredths misdemeanors 11 in mixed caseloads. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02122-01-5